Illinois, session 104th, SB1934.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 1-160 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/1-160)7    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-719)8    Sec. 1-160. Provisions applicable to new hires. 9    (a) The provisions of this Section apply to a person who, 10on or after January 1, 2011, first becomes a member or a 11participant under any reciprocal retirement system or pension 12fund established under this Code, other than a retirement 13system or pension fund established under Article 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 147, 15, or 18 of this Code, notwithstanding any other provision 15of this Code to the contrary, but do not apply to any 16self-managed plan established under this Code or to any 17participant of the retirement plan established under Section 1822-101; except that this Section applies to a person who 19elected to establish alternative credits by electing in 20writing after January 1, 2011, but before August 8, 2011, 21under Section 7-145.1 of this Code. Notwithstanding anything 22to the contrary in this Section, for purposes of this Section, 23a person who is a Tier 1 regular employee as defined in Section   SB1934- 2 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b17-109.4 of this Code or who participated in a retirement 2system under Article 15 prior to January 1, 2011 shall be 3deemed a person who first became a member or participant prior 4to January 1, 2011 under any retirement system or pension fund 5subject to this Section. The changes made to this Section by 6Public Act 98-596 are a clarification of existing law and are 7intended to be retroactive to January 1, 2011 (the effective 8date of Public Act 96-889), notwithstanding the provisions of 9Section 1-103.1 of this Code.10    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 11noncovered employee under Article 14 on or after the 12implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 13for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection 14(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 15under this Section and the applicable provisions of that 16Article.17    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 18member or participant under Article 16 on or after the 19implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 20for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection 21(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 22under this Section and the applicable provisions of that 23Article.24    This Section does not apply to a person who elects under 25subsection (c-5) of Section 1-161 to receive the benefits 26under Section 1-161.   SB1934- 3 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 2member or participant of an affected pension fund on or after 6 3months after the resolution or ordinance date, as defined in 4Section 1-162, unless that person elects under subsection (c) 5of Section 1-162 to receive the benefits provided under this 6Section and the applicable provisions of the Article under 7which he or she is a member or participant. 8    (b) "Final average salary" means, except as otherwise 9provided in this subsection, the average monthly (or annual) 10salary obtained by dividing the total salary or earnings 11calculated under the Article applicable to the member or 12participant during the 96 consecutive months (or 8 consecutive 13years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) of 14service in which the total salary or earnings calculated under 15the applicable Article was the highest by the number of months 16(or years) of service in that period. For the purposes of a 17person who first becomes a member or participant of any 18retirement system or pension fund to which this Section 19applies on or after January 1, 2011, in this Code, "final 20average salary" shall be substituted for the following:21        (1) (Blank).22        (2) In Articles 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12, "highest average 23    annual salary for any 4 consecutive years within the last 24    10 years of service immediately preceding the date of 25    withdrawal". 26        (3) In Article 13, "average final salary".   SB1934- 4 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1        (4) In Article 14, "final average compensation". 2        (5) In Article 17, "average salary". 3        (6) In Section 22-207, "wages or salary received by 4    him at the date of retirement or discharge". 5    A member of the Teachers' Retirement System of the State 6of Illinois who retires on or after June 1, 2021 and for whom 7the 2020-2021 school year is used in the calculation of the 8member's final average salary shall use the higher of the 9following for the purpose of determining the member's final 10average salary:11        (A) the amount otherwise calculated under the first 12    paragraph of this subsection; or13        (B) an amount calculated by the Teachers' Retirement 14    System of the State of Illinois using the average of the 15    monthly (or annual) salary obtained by dividing the total 16    salary or earnings calculated under Article 16 applicable 17    to the member or participant during the 96 months (or 8 18    years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) 19    of service in which the total salary or earnings 20    calculated under the Article was the highest by the number 21    of months (or years) of service in that period.22    (b-5) Beginning on January 1, 2011, for all purposes under 23this Code (including without limitation the calculation of 24benefits and employee contributions), the annual earnings, 25salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a member or 26participant to whom this Section applies shall not exceed   SB1934- 5 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1$106,800; however, that amount shall annually thereafter be 2increased by the lesser of (i) 3% of that amount, including all 3previous adjustments, or (ii) one-half the annual unadjusted 4percentage increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer 5price index-u for the 12 months ending with the September 6preceding each November 1, including all previous adjustments.7    For the purposes of this Section, "consumer price index-u" 8means the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of 9the United States Department of Labor that measures the 10average change in prices of goods and services purchased by 11all urban consumers, United States city average, all items, 121982-84 = 100. The new amount resulting from each annual 13adjustment shall be determined by the Public Pension Division 14of the Department of Insurance and made available to the 15boards of the retirement systems and pension funds by November 161 of each year. 17    (b-10) Beginning on January 1, 2024, for all purposes 18under this Code (including, without limitation, the 19calculation of benefits and employee contributions), the 20annual earnings, salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a 21member or participant under Article 9 to whom this Section 22applies shall include an annual earnings, salary, or wage cap 23that tracks the Social Security wage base. Maximum annual 24earnings, wages, or salary shall be the annual contribution 25and benefit base established for the applicable year by the 26Commissioner of the Social Security Administration under the   SB1934- 6 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1federal Social Security Act. 2    However, in no event shall the annual earnings, salary, or 3wages for the purposes of this Article and Article 9 exceed any 4limitation imposed on annual earnings, salary, or wages under 5Section 1-117. Under no circumstances shall the maximum amount 6of annual earnings, salary, or wages be greater than the 7amount set forth in this subsection (b-10) as a result of 8reciprocal service or any provisions regarding reciprocal 9services, nor shall the Fund under Article 9 be required to pay 10any refund as a result of the application of this maximum 11annual earnings, salary, and wage cap. 12    Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause or otherwise 13result in any retroactive adjustment of any employee 14contributions. Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause 15or otherwise result in any retroactive adjustment of 16disability or other payments made between January 1, 2011 and 17January 1, 2024. 18    (c) A member or participant is entitled to a retirement 19annuity upon written application if he or she has attained age 2067 (age 65, with respect to service under Article 12 that is 21subject to this Section, for a member or participant under 22Article 12 who first becomes a member or participant under 23Article 12 on or after January 1, 2022 or who makes the 24election under item (i) of subsection (d-15) of this Section) 25and has at least 10 years of service credit and is otherwise 26eligible under the requirements of the applicable Article.   SB1934- 7 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1    A member or participant who has attained age 62 (age 60, 2with respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to 3this Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 4first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 5after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 6of subsection (d-15) of this Section) and has at least 10 years 7of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 8requirements of the applicable Article may elect to receive 9the lower retirement annuity provided in subsection (d) of 10this Section. 11    (c-5) A person who first becomes a member or a participant 12subject to this Section on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective 13date of Public Act 100-23), notwithstanding any other 14provision of this Code to the contrary, is entitled to a 15retirement annuity under Article 8 or Article 11 upon written 16application if he or she has attained age 65 and has at least 1710 years of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 18requirements of Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code, 19whichever is applicable. 20    (d) The retirement annuity of a member or participant who 21is retiring after attaining age 62 (age 60, with respect to 22service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 23member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 24member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 252022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 26(d-15) of this Section) with at least 10 years of service   SB1934- 8 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for each full month 2that the member's age is under age 67 (age 65, with respect to 3service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 4member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 5member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 62022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 7(d-15) of this Section).8    (d-5) The retirement annuity payable under Article 8 or 9Article 11 to an eligible person subject to subsection (c-5) 10of this Section who is retiring at age 60 with at least 10 11years of service credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for 12each full month that the member's age is under age 65. 13    (d-10) Each person who first became a member or 14participant under Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code on or 15after January 1, 2011 and prior to July 6, 2017 (the effective 16date of Public Act 100-23) shall make an irrevocable election 17either:18        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 19    provided in subsections (c-5) and (d-5) of this Section, 20    the eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member 21    or participant agreeing to the increases in employee 22    contributions for age and service annuities provided in 23    subsection (a-5) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for 24    service under Article 8) or subsection (a-5) of Section 25    11-170 of this Code (for service under Article 11); or 26        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection   SB1934- 9 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1    (d-10), in which case the member or participant shall 2    continue to be subject to the retirement age provisions in 3    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and the employee 4    contributions for age and service annuity as provided in 5    subsection (a) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for service 6    under Article 8) or subsection (a) of Section 11-170 of 7    this Code (for service under Article 11). 8    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 9between October 1, 2017 and November 15, 2017. A person 10subject to this subsection who makes the required election 11shall remain bound by that election. A person subject to this 12subsection who fails for any reason to make the required 13election within the time specified in this subsection shall be 14deemed to have made the election under item (ii). 15    (d-15) Each person who first becomes a member or 16participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 2011 and 17prior to January 1, 2022 shall make an irrevocable election 18either: 19        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 20    specified in subsections (c) and (d) of this Section, the 21    eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member or 22    participant agreeing to the increase in employee 23    contributions for service annuities specified in 24    subsection (b) of Section 12-150; or25        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection 26    (d-15), in which case the member or participant shall not   SB1934- 10 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1    be eligible for the reduced retirement age specified in 2    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and shall not be 3    subject to the increase in employee contributions for 4    service annuities specified in subsection (b) of Section 5    12-150. 6    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 7between January 1, 2022 and April 1, 2022. A person subject to 8this subsection who makes the required election shall remain 9bound by that election. A person subject to this subsection 10who fails for any reason to make the required election within 11the time specified in this subsection shall be deemed to have 12made the election under item (ii). 13    (e) Any retirement annuity or supplemental annuity shall 14be subject to annual increases on the January 1 occurring 15either on or after the attainment of age 67 (age 65, with 16respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to this 17Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 18first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 19after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 20of subsection (d-15); and beginning on July 6, 2017 (the 21effective date of Public Act 100-23), age 65 with respect to 22service under Article 8 or Article 11 for eligible persons 23who: (i) are subject to subsection (c-5) of this Section; or 24(ii) made the election under item (i) of subsection (d-10) of 25this Section) or the first anniversary of the annuity start 26date, whichever is later. Each annual increase shall be   SB1934- 11 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1calculated at 3% or one-half the annual unadjusted percentage 2increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer price 3index-u for the 12 months ending with the September preceding 4each November 1, whichever is less, of the originally granted 5retirement annuity. If the annual unadjusted percentage change 6in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with the 7September preceding each November 1 is zero or there is a 8decrease, then the annuity shall not be increased. 9    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 10changes made to this Section by Public Act 102-263 are 11applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 12active service on or after August 6, 2021 (the effective date 13of Public Act 102-263). 14    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 15changes made to this Section by Public Act 100-23 are 16applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 17active service on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective date of 18Public Act 100-23). 19    (f) The initial survivor's or widow's annuity of an 20otherwise eligible survivor or widow of a retired member or 21participant who first became a member or participant on or 22after January 1, 2011 shall be in the amount of 66 2/3% of the 23retired member's or participant's retirement annuity at the 24date of death. In the case of the death of a member or 25participant who has not retired and who first became a member 26or participant on or after January 1, 2011, eligibility for a   SB1934- 12 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1survivor's or widow's annuity shall be determined by the 2applicable Article of this Code. The initial survivor's or 3widow's benefit shall be 66 2/3% of the earned annuity without 4a reduction due to age. A child's annuity of an otherwise 5eligible child shall be in the amount and using the formula 6prescribed under the applicable each Article of this Code, and 7such formula shall be used for calculation of the child's 8annuity only if applicable. If a benefit is paid to both a 9widow or survivor and a child or multiple children, the 10widow's portion shall be calculated in the amount of 66 2/3% 11and reduced by the pro rata portion of any child or children's 12portion as calculated in accordance with the terms of the 13Article of this Code that is applicable to the pension fund or 14retirement system that is providing the benefit using the 15method prescribed in the applicable Article of this Code. Any 16survivor's, or widow's or child's annuity shall be increased 17(1) on each January 1 occurring on or after the commencement of 18the annuity if the deceased member died while receiving a 19retirement annuity or (2) in other cases, on each January 1 20occurring after the first anniversary of the commencement of 21the annuity. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 3% or 22one-half the annual unadjusted percentage increase (but not 23less than zero) in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months 24ending with the September preceding each November 1, whichever 25is less, of the originally granted survivor's widow's, or 26child's annuity. If the annual unadjusted percentage change in   SB1934- 13 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1the consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with the 2September preceding each November 1 is zero or there is a 3decrease, then the annuity shall not be increased. 4    (g) The benefits in Section 14-110 apply if the person is a 5fire fighter in the fire protection service of a department, a 6security employee of the Department of Corrections or the 7Department of Juvenile Justice, or a security employee of the 8Department of Innovation and Technology, as those terms are 9defined in subsection (b) and subsection (c) of Section 1014-110. A person who meets the requirements of this Section is 11entitled to an annuity calculated under the provisions of 12Section 14-110, in lieu of the regular or minimum retirement 13annuity, only if the person has withdrawn from service with 14not less than 20 years of eligible creditable service and has 15attained age 60, regardless of whether the attainment of age 1660 occurs while the person is still in service. 17    (g-5) The benefits in Section 14-110 apply if the person 18is a State policeman, investigator for the Secretary of State, 19conservation police officer, investigator for the Department 20of Revenue or the Illinois Gaming Board, investigator for the 21Office of the Attorney General, Commerce Commission police 22officer, or arson investigator, as those terms are defined in 23subsection (b) and subsection (c) of Section 14-110. A person 24who meets the requirements of this Section is entitled to an 25annuity calculated under the provisions of Section 14-110, in 26lieu of the regular or minimum retirement annuity, only if the   SB1934- 14 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1person has withdrawn from service with not less than 20 years 2of eligible creditable service and has attained age 55, 3regardless of whether the attainment of age 55 occurs while 4the person is still in service. 5    (h) If a person who first becomes a member or a participant 6of a retirement system or pension fund subject to this Section 7on or after January 1, 2011 is receiving a retirement annuity 8or retirement pension under that system or fund and becomes a 9member or participant under any other system or fund created 10by this Code and is employed on a full-time basis, except for 11those members or participants exempted from the provisions of 12this Section under subsection (a) of this Section, then the 13person's retirement annuity or retirement pension under that 14system or fund shall be suspended during that employment. Upon 15termination of that employment, the person's retirement 16annuity or retirement pension payments shall resume and be 17recalculated if recalculation is provided for under the 18applicable Article of this Code.19    If a person who first becomes a member of a retirement 20system or pension fund subject to this Section on or after 21January 1, 2012 and is receiving a retirement annuity or 22retirement pension under that system or fund and accepts on a 23contractual basis a position to provide services to a 24governmental entity from which he or she has retired, then 25that person's annuity or retirement pension earned as an 26active employee of the employer shall be suspended during that   SB1934- 15 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1contractual service. A person receiving an annuity or 2retirement pension under this Code shall notify the pension 3fund or retirement system from which he or she is receiving an 4annuity or retirement pension, as well as his or her 5contractual employer, of his or her retirement status before 6accepting contractual employment. A person who fails to submit 7such notification shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and 8required to pay a fine of $1,000. Upon termination of that 9contractual employment, the person's retirement annuity or 10retirement pension payments shall resume and, if appropriate, 11be recalculated under the applicable provisions of this Code. 12    (i) (Blank). 13    (j) In the case of a conflict between the provisions of 14this Section and any other provision of this Code, the 15provisions of this Section shall control.16(Source: P.A. 101-610, eff. 1-1-20; 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 17102-210, eff. 1-1-22; 102-263, eff. 8-6-21; 102-719, eff. 185-6-22; 103-529, eff. 8-11-23.) 19    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-813)20    Sec. 1-160. Provisions applicable to new hires. 21    (a) The provisions of this Section apply to a person who, 22on or after January 1, 2011, first becomes a member or a 23participant under any reciprocal retirement system or pension 24fund established under this Code, other than a retirement 25system or pension fund established under Article 2, 3, 4, 5, 6,   SB1934- 16 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b17, 15, or 18 of this Code, notwithstanding any other provision 2of this Code to the contrary, but do not apply to any 3self-managed plan established under this Code or to any 4participant of the retirement plan established under Section 522-101; except that this Section applies to a person who 6elected to establish alternative credits by electing in 7writing after January 1, 2011, but before August 8, 2011, 8under Section 7-145.1 of this Code. Notwithstanding anything 9to the contrary in this Section, for purposes of this Section, 10a person who is a Tier 1 regular employee as defined in Section 117-109.4 of this Code or who participated in a retirement 12system under Article 15 prior to January 1, 2011 shall be 13deemed a person who first became a member or participant prior 14to January 1, 2011 under any retirement system or pension fund 15subject to this Section. The changes made to this Section by 16Public Act 98-596 are a clarification of existing law and are 17intended to be retroactive to January 1, 2011 (the effective 18date of Public Act 96-889), notwithstanding the provisions of 19Section 1-103.1 of this Code.20    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 21noncovered employee under Article 14 on or after the 22implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 23for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection 24(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 25under this Section and the applicable provisions of that 26Article.  SB1934- 17 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 2member or participant under Article 16 on or after the 3implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 4for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection 5(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 6under this Section and the applicable provisions of that 7Article.8    This Section does not apply to a person who elects under 9subsection (c-5) of Section 1-161 to receive the benefits 10under Section 1-161. 11    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 12member or participant of an affected pension fund on or after 6 13months after the resolution or ordinance date, as defined in 14Section 1-162, unless that person elects under subsection (c) 15of Section 1-162 to receive the benefits provided under this 16Section and the applicable provisions of the Article under 17which he or she is a member or participant. 18    (b) "Final average salary" means, except as otherwise 19provided in this subsection, the average monthly (or annual) 20salary obtained by dividing the total salary or earnings 21calculated under the Article applicable to the member or 22participant during the 96 consecutive months (or 8 consecutive 23years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) of 24service in which the total salary or earnings calculated under 25the applicable Article was the highest by the number of months 26(or years) of service in that period. For the purposes of a   SB1934- 18 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1person who first becomes a member or participant of any 2retirement system or pension fund to which this Section 3applies on or after January 1, 2011, in this Code, "final 4average salary" shall be substituted for the following:5        (1) (Blank).6        (2) In Articles 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12, "highest average 7    annual salary for any 4 consecutive years within the last 8    10 years of service immediately preceding the date of 9    withdrawal". 10        (3) In Article 13, "average final salary". 11        (4) In Article 14, "final average compensation". 12        (5) In Article 17, "average salary". 13        (6) In Section 22-207, "wages or salary received by 14    him at the date of retirement or discharge". 15    A member of the Teachers' Retirement System of the State 16of Illinois who retires on or after June 1, 2021 and for whom 17the 2020-2021 school year is used in the calculation of the 18member's final average salary shall use the higher of the 19following for the purpose of determining the member's final 20average salary:21        (A) the amount otherwise calculated under the first 22    paragraph of this subsection; or23        (B) an amount calculated by the Teachers' Retirement 24    System of the State of Illinois using the average of the 25    monthly (or annual) salary obtained by dividing the total 26    salary or earnings calculated under Article 16 applicable   SB1934- 19 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1    to the member or participant during the 96 months (or 8 2    years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) 3    of service in which the total salary or earnings 4    calculated under the Article was the highest by the number 5    of months (or years) of service in that period.6    (b-5) Beginning on January 1, 2011, for all purposes under 7this Code (including without limitation the calculation of 8benefits and employee contributions), the annual earnings, 9salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a member or 10participant to whom this Section applies shall not exceed 11$106,800; however, that amount shall annually thereafter be 12increased by the lesser of (i) 3% of that amount, including all 13previous adjustments, or (ii) one-half the annual unadjusted 14percentage increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer 15price index-u for the 12 months ending with the September 16preceding each November 1, including all previous adjustments.17    For the purposes of this Section, "consumer price index-u" 18means the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of 19the United States Department of Labor that measures the 20average change in prices of goods and services purchased by 21all urban consumers, United States city average, all items, 221982-84 = 100. The new amount resulting from each annual 23adjustment shall be determined by the Public Pension Division 24of the Department of Insurance and made available to the 25boards of the retirement systems and pension funds by November 261 of each year.   SB1934- 20 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1    (b-10) Beginning on January 1, 2024, for all purposes 2under this Code (including, without limitation, the 3calculation of benefits and employee contributions), the 4annual earnings, salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a 5member or participant under Article 9 to whom this Section 6applies shall include an annual earnings, salary, or wage cap 7that tracks the Social Security wage base. Maximum annual 8earnings, wages, or salary shall be the annual contribution 9and benefit base established for the applicable year by the 10Commissioner of the Social Security Administration under the 11federal Social Security Act. 12    However, in no event shall the annual earnings, salary, or 13wages for the purposes of this Article and Article 9 exceed any 14limitation imposed on annual earnings, salary, or wages under 15Section 1-117. Under no circumstances shall the maximum amount 16of annual earnings, salary, or wages be greater than the 17amount set forth in this subsection (b-10) as a result of 18reciprocal service or any provisions regarding reciprocal 19services, nor shall the Fund under Article 9 be required to pay 20any refund as a result of the application of this maximum 21annual earnings, salary, and wage cap. 22    Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause or otherwise 23result in any retroactive adjustment of any employee 24contributions. Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause 25or otherwise result in any retroactive adjustment of 26disability or other payments made between January 1, 2011 and   SB1934- 21 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1January 1, 2024. 2    (c) A member or participant is entitled to a retirement 3annuity upon written application if he or she has attained age 467 (age 65, with respect to service under Article 12 that is 5subject to this Section, for a member or participant under 6Article 12 who first becomes a member or participant under 7Article 12 on or after January 1, 2022 or who makes the 8election under item (i) of subsection (d-15) of this Section) 9and has at least 10 years of service credit and is otherwise 10eligible under the requirements of the applicable Article. 11    A member or participant who has attained age 62 (age 60, 12with respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to 13this Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 14first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 15after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 16of subsection (d-15) of this Section) and has at least 10 years 17of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 18requirements of the applicable Article may elect to receive 19the lower retirement annuity provided in subsection (d) of 20this Section. 21    (c-5) A person who first becomes a member or a participant 22subject to this Section on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective 23date of Public Act 100-23), notwithstanding any other 24provision of this Code to the contrary, is entitled to a 25retirement annuity under Article 8 or Article 11 upon written 26application if he or she has attained age 65 and has at least   SB1934- 22 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b110 years of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 2requirements of Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code, 3whichever is applicable. 4    (d) The retirement annuity of a member or participant who 5is retiring after attaining age 62 (age 60, with respect to 6service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 7member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 8member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 92022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 10(d-15) of this Section) with at least 10 years of service 11credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for each full month 12that the member's age is under age 67 (age 65, with respect to 13service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 14member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 15member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 162022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 17(d-15) of this Section).18    (d-5) The retirement annuity payable under Article 8 or 19Article 11 to an eligible person subject to subsection (c-5) 20of this Section who is retiring at age 60 with at least 10 21years of service credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for 22each full month that the member's age is under age 65. 23    (d-10) Each person who first became a member or 24participant under Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code on or 25after January 1, 2011 and prior to July 6, 2017 (the effective 26date of Public Act 100-23) shall make an irrevocable election   SB1934- 23 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1either:2        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 3    provided in subsections (c-5) and (d-5) of this Section, 4    the eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member 5    or participant agreeing to the increases in employee 6    contributions for age and service annuities provided in 7    subsection (a-5) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for 8    service under Article 8) or subsection (a-5) of Section 9    11-170 of this Code (for service under Article 11); or 10        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection 11    (d-10), in which case the member or participant shall 12    continue to be subject to the retirement age provisions in 13    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and the employee 14    contributions for age and service annuity as provided in 15    subsection (a) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for service 16    under Article 8) or subsection (a) of Section 11-170 of 17    this Code (for service under Article 11). 18    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 19between October 1, 2017 and November 15, 2017. A person 20subject to this subsection who makes the required election 21shall remain bound by that election. A person subject to this 22subsection who fails for any reason to make the required 23election within the time specified in this subsection shall be 24deemed to have made the election under item (ii). 25    (d-15) Each person who first becomes a member or 26participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 2011 and   SB1934- 24 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1prior to January 1, 2022 shall make an irrevocable election 2either: 3        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 4    specified in subsections (c) and (d) of this Section, the 5    eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member or 6    participant agreeing to the increase in employee 7    contributions for service annuities specified in 8    subsection (b) of Section 12-150; or9        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection 10    (d-15), in which case the member or participant shall not 11    be eligible for the reduced retirement age specified in 12    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and shall not be 13    subject to the increase in employee contributions for 14    service annuities specified in subsection (b) of Section 15    12-150. 16    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 17between January 1, 2022 and April 1, 2022. A person subject to 18this subsection who makes the required election shall remain 19bound by that election. A person subject to this subsection 20who fails for any reason to make the required election within 21the time specified in this subsection shall be deemed to have 22made the election under item (ii). 23    (e) Any retirement annuity or supplemental annuity shall 24be subject to annual increases on the January 1 occurring 25either on or after the attainment of age 67 (age 65, with 26respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to this   SB1934- 25 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 2first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 3after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 4of subsection (d-15); and beginning on July 6, 2017 (the 5effective date of Public Act 100-23), age 65 with respect to 6service under Article 8 or Article 11 for eligible persons 7who: (i) are subject to subsection (c-5) of this Section; or 8(ii) made the election under item (i) of subsection (d-10) of 9this Section) or the first anniversary of the annuity start 10date, whichever is later. Each annual increase shall be 11calculated at 3% or one-half the annual unadjusted percentage 12increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer price 13index-u for the 12 months ending with the September preceding 14each November 1, whichever is less, of the originally granted 15retirement annuity. If the annual unadjusted percentage change 16in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with the 17September preceding each November 1 is zero or there is a 18decrease, then the annuity shall not be increased. 19    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 20changes made to this Section by Public Act 102-263 are 21applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 22active service on or after August 6, 2021 (the effective date 23of Public Act 102-263). 24    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 25changes made to this Section by Public Act 100-23 are 26applicable without regard to whether the employee was in   SB1934- 26 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1active service on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective date of 2Public Act 100-23). 3    (f) The initial survivor's or widow's annuity of an 4otherwise eligible survivor or widow of a retired member or 5participant who first became a member or participant on or 6after January 1, 2011 shall be in the amount of 66 2/3% of the 7retired member's or participant's retirement annuity at the 8date of death. In the case of the death of a member or 9participant who has not retired and who first became a member 10or participant on or after January 1, 2011, eligibility for a 11survivor's or widow's annuity shall be determined by the 12applicable Article of this Code. The initial survivor's or 13widow's benefit shall be 66 2/3% of the earned annuity without 14a reduction due to age. A child's annuity of an otherwise 15eligible child shall be in the amount and using the formula 16prescribed under the applicable each Article of this Code, and 17such formula shall be used for calculation of the child's 18annuity only if applicable. If a benefit is paid to both a 19widow or survivor and a child or multiple children, the 20widow's portion shall be calculated in the amount of 66 2/3% 21and reduced by the pro rata portion of any child or children's 22portion as calculated in accordance with the terms of the 23Article of this Code that is applicable to the pension fund or 24retirement system that is providing the benefit using the 25method prescribed in the applicable Article of this Code. Any 26survivor's, or widow's or child's annuity shall be increased   SB1934- 27 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1(1) on each January 1 occurring on or after the commencement of 2the annuity if the deceased member died while receiving a 3retirement annuity or (2) in other cases, on each January 1 4occurring after the first anniversary of the commencement of 5the annuity. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 3% or 6one-half the annual unadjusted percentage increase (but not 7less than zero) in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months 8ending with the September preceding each November 1, whichever 9is less, of the originally granted survivor's widow's, or 10child's annuity. If the annual unadjusted percentage change in 11the consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with the 12September preceding each November 1 is zero or there is a 13decrease, then the annuity shall not be increased. 14    (g) The benefits in Section 14-110 apply only if the 15person is a State policeman, a fire fighter in the fire 16protection service of a department, a conservation police 17officer, an investigator for the Secretary of State, an arson 18investigator, a Commerce Commission police officer, 19investigator for the Department of Revenue or the Illinois 20Gaming Board, a security employee of the Department of 21Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice, or a 22security employee of the Department of Innovation and 23Technology, as those terms are defined in subsection (b) and 24subsection (c) of Section 14-110. A person who meets the 25requirements of this Section is entitled to an annuity 26calculated under the provisions of Section 14-110, in lieu of   SB1934- 28 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1the regular or minimum retirement annuity, only if the person 2has withdrawn from service with not less than 20 years of 3eligible creditable service and has attained age 60, 4regardless of whether the attainment of age 60 occurs while 5the person is still in service. 6    (h) If a person who first becomes a member or a participant 7of a retirement system or pension fund subject to this Section 8on or after January 1, 2011 is receiving a retirement annuity 9or retirement pension under that system or fund and becomes a 10member or participant under any other system or fund created 11by this Code and is employed on a full-time basis, except for 12those members or participants exempted from the provisions of 13this Section under subsection (a) of this Section, then the 14person's retirement annuity or retirement pension under that 15system or fund shall be suspended during that employment. Upon 16termination of that employment, the person's retirement 17annuity or retirement pension payments shall resume and be 18recalculated if recalculation is provided for under the 19applicable Article of this Code.20    If a person who first becomes a member of a retirement 21system or pension fund subject to this Section on or after 22January 1, 2012 and is receiving a retirement annuity or 23retirement pension under that system or fund and accepts on a 24contractual basis a position to provide services to a 25governmental entity from which he or she has retired, then 26that person's annuity or retirement pension earned as an   SB1934- 29 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1active employee of the employer shall be suspended during that 2contractual service. A person receiving an annuity or 3retirement pension under this Code shall notify the pension 4fund or retirement system from which he or she is receiving an 5annuity or retirement pension, as well as his or her 6contractual employer, of his or her retirement status before 7accepting contractual employment. A person who fails to submit 8such notification shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and 9required to pay a fine of $1,000. Upon termination of that 10contractual employment, the person's retirement annuity or 11retirement pension payments shall resume and, if appropriate, 12be recalculated under the applicable provisions of this Code. 13    (i) (Blank). 14    (j) In the case of a conflict between the provisions of 15this Section and any other provision of this Code, the 16provisions of this Section shall control.17(Source: P.A. 101-610, eff. 1-1-20; 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 18102-210, eff. 1-1-22; 102-263, eff. 8-6-21; 102-813, eff. 195-13-22; 103-529, eff. 8-11-23.) 20    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-956)21    Sec. 1-160. Provisions applicable to new hires. 22    (a) The provisions of this Section apply to a person who, 23on or after January 1, 2011, first becomes a member or a 24participant under any reciprocal retirement system or pension 25fund established under this Code, other than a retirement   SB1934- 30 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1system or pension fund established under Article 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 27, 15, or 18 of this Code, notwithstanding any other provision 3of this Code to the contrary, but do not apply to any 4self-managed plan established under this Code or to any 5participant of the retirement plan established under Section 622-101; except that this Section applies to a person who 7elected to establish alternative credits by electing in 8writing after January 1, 2011, but before August 8, 2011, 9under Section 7-145.1 of this Code. Notwithstanding anything 10to the contrary in this Section, for purposes of this Section, 11a person who is a Tier 1 regular employee as defined in Section 127-109.4 of this Code or who participated in a retirement 13system under Article 15 prior to January 1, 2011 shall be 14deemed a person who first became a member or participant prior 15to January 1, 2011 under any retirement system or pension fund 16subject to this Section. The changes made to this Section by 17Public Act 98-596 are a clarification of existing law and are 18intended to be retroactive to January 1, 2011 (the effective 19date of Public Act 96-889), notwithstanding the provisions of 20Section 1-103.1 of this Code.21    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 22noncovered employee under Article 14 on or after the 23implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 24for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection 25(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 26under this Section and the applicable provisions of that   SB1934- 31 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1Article.2    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 3member or participant under Article 16 on or after the 4implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 5for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection 6(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 7under this Section and the applicable provisions of that 8Article.9    This Section does not apply to a person who elects under 10subsection (c-5) of Section 1-161 to receive the benefits 11under Section 1-161. 12    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 13member or participant of an affected pension fund on or after 6 14months after the resolution or ordinance date, as defined in 15Section 1-162, unless that person elects under subsection (c) 16of Section 1-162 to receive the benefits provided under this 17Section and the applicable provisions of the Article under 18which he or she is a member or participant. 19    (b) "Final average salary" means, except as otherwise 20provided in this subsection, the average monthly (or annual) 21salary obtained by dividing the total salary or earnings 22calculated under the Article applicable to the member or 23participant during the 96 consecutive months (or 8 consecutive 24years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) of 25service in which the total salary or earnings calculated under 26the applicable Article was the highest by the number of months   SB1934- 32 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1(or years) of service in that period. For the purposes of a 2person who first becomes a member or participant of any 3retirement system or pension fund to which this Section 4applies on or after January 1, 2011, in this Code, "final 5average salary" shall be substituted for the following:6        (1) (Blank).7        (2) In Articles 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12, "highest average 8    annual salary for any 4 consecutive years within the last 9    10 years of service immediately preceding the date of 10    withdrawal". 11        (3) In Article 13, "average final salary". 12        (4) In Article 14, "final average compensation". 13        (5) In Article 17, "average salary". 14        (6) In Section 22-207, "wages or salary received by 15    him at the date of retirement or discharge". 16    A member of the Teachers' Retirement System of the State 17of Illinois who retires on or after June 1, 2021 and for whom 18the 2020-2021 school year is used in the calculation of the 19member's final average salary shall use the higher of the 20following for the purpose of determining the member's final 21average salary:22        (A) the amount otherwise calculated under the first 23    paragraph of this subsection; or24        (B) an amount calculated by the Teachers' Retirement 25    System of the State of Illinois using the average of the 26    monthly (or annual) salary obtained by dividing the total   SB1934- 33 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1    salary or earnings calculated under Article 16 applicable 2    to the member or participant during the 96 months (or 8 3    years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) 4    of service in which the total salary or earnings 5    calculated under the Article was the highest by the number 6    of months (or years) of service in that period.7    (b-5) Beginning on January 1, 2011, for all purposes under 8this Code (including without limitation the calculation of 9benefits and employee contributions), the annual earnings, 10salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a member or 11participant to whom this Section applies shall not exceed 12$106,800; however, that amount shall annually thereafter be 13increased by the lesser of (i) 3% of that amount, including all 14previous adjustments, or (ii) one-half the annual unadjusted 15percentage increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer 16price index-u for the 12 months ending with the September 17preceding each November 1, including all previous adjustments.18    For the purposes of this Section, "consumer price index-u" 19means the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of 20the United States Department of Labor that measures the 21average change in prices of goods and services purchased by 22all urban consumers, United States city average, all items, 231982-84 = 100. The new amount resulting from each annual 24adjustment shall be determined by the Public Pension Division 25of the Department of Insurance and made available to the 26boards of the retirement systems and pension funds by November   SB1934- 34 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b11 of each year. 2    (b-10) Beginning on January 1, 2024, for all purposes 3under this Code (including, without limitation, the 4calculation of benefits and employee contributions), the 5annual earnings, salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a 6member or participant under Article 9 to whom this Section 7applies shall include an annual earnings, salary, or wage cap 8that tracks the Social Security wage base. Maximum annual 9earnings, wages, or salary shall be the annual contribution 10and benefit base established for the applicable year by the 11Commissioner of the Social Security Administration under the 12federal Social Security Act. 13    However, in no event shall the annual earnings, salary, or 14wages for the purposes of this Article and Article 9 exceed any 15limitation imposed on annual earnings, salary, or wages under 16Section 1-117. Under no circumstances shall the maximum amount 17of annual earnings, salary, or wages be greater than the 18amount set forth in this subsection (b-10) as a result of 19reciprocal service or any provisions regarding reciprocal 20services, nor shall the Fund under Article 9 be required to pay 21any refund as a result of the application of this maximum 22annual earnings, salary, and wage cap. 23    Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause or otherwise 24result in any retroactive adjustment of any employee 25contributions. Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause 26or otherwise result in any retroactive adjustment of   SB1934- 35 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1disability or other payments made between January 1, 2011 and 2January 1, 2024. 3    (c) A member or participant is entitled to a retirement 4annuity upon written application if he or she has attained age 567 (age 65, with respect to service under Article 12 that is 6subject to this Section, for a member or participant under 7Article 12 who first becomes a member or participant under 8Article 12 on or after January 1, 2022 or who makes the 9election under item (i) of subsection (d-15) of this Section) 10and has at least 10 years of service credit and is otherwise 11eligible under the requirements of the applicable Article. 12    A member or participant who has attained age 62 (age 60, 13with respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to 14this Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 15first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 16after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 17of subsection (d-15) of this Section) and has at least 10 years 18of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 19requirements of the applicable Article may elect to receive 20the lower retirement annuity provided in subsection (d) of 21this Section. 22    (c-5) A person who first becomes a member or a participant 23subject to this Section on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective 24date of Public Act 100-23), notwithstanding any other 25provision of this Code to the contrary, is entitled to a 26retirement annuity under Article 8 or Article 11 upon written   SB1934- 36 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1application if he or she has attained age 65 and has at least 210 years of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 3requirements of Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code, 4whichever is applicable. 5    (d) The retirement annuity of a member or participant who 6is retiring after attaining age 62 (age 60, with respect to 7service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 8member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 9member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 102022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 11(d-15) of this Section) with at least 10 years of service 12credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for each full month 13that the member's age is under age 67 (age 65, with respect to 14service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 15member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 16member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 172022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 18(d-15) of this Section).19    (d-5) The retirement annuity payable under Article 8 or 20Article 11 to an eligible person subject to subsection (c-5) 21of this Section who is retiring at age 60 with at least 10 22years of service credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for 23each full month that the member's age is under age 65. 24    (d-10) Each person who first became a member or 25participant under Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code on or 26after January 1, 2011 and prior to July 6, 2017 (the effective   SB1934- 37 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1date of Public Act 100-23) shall make an irrevocable election 2either:3        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 4    provided in subsections (c-5) and (d-5) of this Section, 5    the eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member 6    or participant agreeing to the increases in employee 7    contributions for age and service annuities provided in 8    subsection (a-5) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for 9    service under Article 8) or subsection (a-5) of Section 10    11-170 of this Code (for service under Article 11); or 11        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection 12    (d-10), in which case the member or participant shall 13    continue to be subject to the retirement age provisions in 14    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and the employee 15    contributions for age and service annuity as provided in 16    subsection (a) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for service 17    under Article 8) or subsection (a) of Section 11-170 of 18    this Code (for service under Article 11). 19    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 20between October 1, 2017 and November 15, 2017. A person 21subject to this subsection who makes the required election 22shall remain bound by that election. A person subject to this 23subsection who fails for any reason to make the required 24election within the time specified in this subsection shall be 25deemed to have made the election under item (ii). 26    (d-15) Each person who first becomes a member or   SB1934- 38 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 2011 and 2prior to January 1, 2022 shall make an irrevocable election 3either: 4        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 5    specified in subsections (c) and (d) of this Section, the 6    eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member or 7    participant agreeing to the increase in employee 8    contributions for service annuities specified in 9    subsection (b) of Section 12-150; or10        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection 11    (d-15), in which case the member or participant shall not 12    be eligible for the reduced retirement age specified in 13    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and shall not be 14    subject to the increase in employee contributions for 15    service annuities specified in subsection (b) of Section 16    12-150. 17    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 18between January 1, 2022 and April 1, 2022. A person subject to 19this subsection who makes the required election shall remain 20bound by that election. A person subject to this subsection 21who fails for any reason to make the required election within 22the time specified in this subsection shall be deemed to have 23made the election under item (ii). 24    (e) Any retirement annuity or supplemental annuity shall 25be subject to annual increases on the January 1 occurring 26either on or after the attainment of age 67 (age 65, with   SB1934- 39 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to this 2Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 3first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 4after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 5of subsection (d-15); and beginning on July 6, 2017 (the 6effective date of Public Act 100-23), age 65 with respect to 7service under Article 8 or Article 11 for eligible persons 8who: (i) are subject to subsection (c-5) of this Section; or 9(ii) made the election under item (i) of subsection (d-10) of 10this Section) or the first anniversary of the annuity start 11date, whichever is later. Each annual increase shall be 12calculated at 3% or one-half the annual unadjusted percentage 13increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer price 14index-u for the 12 months ending with the September preceding 15each November 1, whichever is less, of the originally granted 16retirement annuity. If the annual unadjusted percentage change 17in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with the 18September preceding each November 1 is zero or there is a 19decrease, then the annuity shall not be increased. 20    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 21changes made to this Section by Public Act 102-263 are 22applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 23active service on or after August 6, 2021 (the effective date 24of Public Act 102-263). 25    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 26changes made to this Section by Public Act 100-23 are   SB1934- 40 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 2active service on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective date of 3Public Act 100-23). 4    (f) The initial survivor's or widow's annuity of an 5otherwise eligible survivor or widow of a retired member or 6participant who first became a member or participant on or 7after January 1, 2011 shall be in the amount of 66 2/3% of the 8retired member's or participant's retirement annuity at the 9date of death. In the case of the death of a member or 10participant who has not retired and who first became a member 11or participant on or after January 1, 2011, eligibility for a 12survivor's or widow's annuity shall be determined by the 13applicable Article of this Code. The initial survivor's or 14widow's benefit shall be 66 2/3% of the earned annuity without 15a reduction due to age. A child's annuity of an otherwise 16eligible child shall be in the amount and using the formula 17prescribed under the applicable each Article of this Code, and 18such formula shall be used for calculation of the child's 19annuity only if applicable. If a benefit is paid to both a 20widow or survivor and a child or multiple children, the 21widow's portion shall be calculated in the amount of 66 2/3% 22and reduced by the pro rata portion of any child or children's 23portion as calculated in accordance with the terms of the 24Article of this Code that is applicable to the pension fund or 25retirement system that is providing the benefit using the 26method prescribed in the applicable Article of this Code. Any   SB1934- 41 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1survivor's, or widow's or child's annuity shall be increased 2(1) on each January 1 occurring on or after the commencement of 3the annuity if the deceased member died while receiving a 4retirement annuity or (2) in other cases, on each January 1 5occurring after the first anniversary of the commencement of 6the annuity. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 3% or 7one-half the annual unadjusted percentage increase (but not 8less than zero) in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months 9ending with the September preceding each November 1, whichever 10is less, of the originally granted survivor's widow's, or 11child's annuity. If the annual unadjusted percentage change in 12the consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with the 13September preceding each November 1 is zero or there is a 14decrease, then the annuity shall not be increased. 15    (g) The benefits in Section 14-110 apply only if the 16person is a State policeman, a fire fighter in the fire 17protection service of a department, a conservation police 18officer, an investigator for the Secretary of State, an 19investigator for the Office of the Attorney General, an arson 20investigator, a Commerce Commission police officer, 21investigator for the Department of Revenue or the Illinois 22Gaming Board, a security employee of the Department of 23Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice, or a 24security employee of the Department of Innovation and 25Technology, as those terms are defined in subsection (b) and 26subsection (c) of Section 14-110. A person who meets the   SB1934- 42 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1requirements of this Section is entitled to an annuity 2calculated under the provisions of Section 14-110, in lieu of 3the regular or minimum retirement annuity, only if the person 4has withdrawn from service with not less than 20 years of 5eligible creditable service and has attained age 60, 6regardless of whether the attainment of age 60 occurs while 7the person is still in service. 8    (h) If a person who first becomes a member or a participant 9of a retirement system or pension fund subject to this Section 10on or after January 1, 2011 is receiving a retirement annuity 11or retirement pension under that system or fund and becomes a 12member or participant under any other system or fund created 13by this Code and is employed on a full-time basis, except for 14those members or participants exempted from the provisions of 15this Section under subsection (a) of this Section, then the 16person's retirement annuity or retirement pension under that 17system or fund shall be suspended during that employment. Upon 18termination of that employment, the person's retirement 19annuity or retirement pension payments shall resume and be 20recalculated if recalculation is provided for under the 21applicable Article of this Code.22    If a person who first becomes a member of a retirement 23system or pension fund subject to this Section on or after 24January 1, 2012 and is receiving a retirement annuity or 25retirement pension under that system or fund and accepts on a 26contractual basis a position to provide services to a   SB1934- 43 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1governmental entity from which he or she has retired, then 2that person's annuity or retirement pension earned as an 3active employee of the employer shall be suspended during that 4contractual service. A person receiving an annuity or 5retirement pension under this Code shall notify the pension 6fund or retirement system from which he or she is receiving an 7annuity or retirement pension, as well as his or her 8contractual employer, of his or her retirement status before 9accepting contractual employment. A person who fails to submit 10such notification shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and 11required to pay a fine of $1,000. Upon termination of that 12contractual employment, the person's retirement annuity or 13retirement pension payments shall resume and, if appropriate, 14be recalculated under the applicable provisions of this Code. 15    (i) (Blank). 16    (j) In the case of a conflict between the provisions of 17this Section and any other provision of this Code, the 18provisions of this Section shall control.19(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-210, eff. 1-1-22; 20102-263, eff. 8-6-21; 102-956, eff. 5-27-22; 103-529, eff. 218-11-23.) 22    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 23Section 8.49 as follows: 24    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)  SB1934- 44 -LRB104 10087 RPS 20159 b1    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 28 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 3the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 4Act of the 104th General Assembly.